Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-731
Diploma of high school equivalency; application; fee; disbursement; duplicate; transcript; fees.

The application for a diploma of high school equivalency shall be submitted on a form to be furnished by the Commissioner of Education and shall be accompanied by a fee of five dollars which will not be refundable under any circumstances. A fee of two dollars shall be charged for the issuance of a duplicate diploma of high school equivalency. A fee of two dollars shall be charged for the issuance of an official transcript. All fees collected for the issuance or reissuance of such a diploma shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

Laws 1959, c. 399, § 2, p. 1359;

Laws 1969, c. 721, § 3, p. 2751;

Laws 1975, LB 449, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 71;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,147.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 405.